Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Public  Employees Re-
tirement System, for the following purposes:
(1) Central Administration
Division..................................... $ 5,549,108
(2) Financial and Administrative
Services Division....................... $ 33,101,014
(3) Information Services Division .. $ 26,144,003
(4) Operations Division................... $ 39,438,343
(5) Compliance, Audit and Risk
Division..................................... $ 8,524,534
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of $1 is
established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of
expenses by the Public Employees Retirement System from the Employer Incentive Fund.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$11,539,471 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the Public Employees Retirement  System from the School Districts
Unfunded Liability Fund.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Public  Employees Re-
tirement System, for the  Core Retirement System Applications program and the
implementation of chapter 355, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 1049):
(1) Project management and
administration........................... $ 2,500,000
(2) Quality assurance and
testing ....................................... $ 2,500,000
Enrolled House Bill 5032 (HB 5032-A) Page 1
(3) Information technology
applications............................... $ 25,992,000
(4) Operational implementation...... $ 7,567,714
(5) Contingency reserve ................. $ 500,000
SECTION 5. For the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, expenditures by the Public Em-
ployees Retirement System for refunds,  retirement benefits, deferred compensation and in-
dividual account program payments, health insurance premiums, health  insurance premium
subsidies, third party administrator  costs for health and individual account programs and
Public Employee Benefit Equalization Fund payments are not limited.
SECTION 6. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Passed by House June 20, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5032 (HB 5032-A) Page 2